Idaho statutes. Title 50 MUNICIPAL CORPORATIONS
Chapter 31 COMMUNITY INFRASTRUCTURE DISTRICT ACT
§ 50-3109. Special assessments — Bonds.

After district formation, upon the submission of a petition signed by no fewer than two-thirds (0.6667) of the owners of all the lands located in a proposed assessment area, the district board shall adopt a resolution ordering that a hearing be held to determine whether a special assessment should be imposed and special assessment bonds be issued to provide money for community infrastructure consistent with the general plan and the exercise by the district board of any of its powers under section 50-3105, Idaho Code.

Notice of the hearing shall be posted in three (3) public places within the boundaries of the district not less than thirty (30) days before the hearing. Notice of the hearing shall also be published twice, the first time not less than twelve (12) days prior to the hearing and the second time not less than five (5) days prior to the hearing, in a newspaper of general circulation in each county or city in which the district is located. A copy of such notice shall also be mailed to each district resident and each owner of real property in the district if known or such owner’s agent if known, addressed to such person at his or her post office address if known or, if unknown, to a post office in the county or city where the district is located. Ownership of real property shall be determined as of the date of the adoption of the resolution ordering the hearing. The notice shall include the following:

A description of the real property to be included within the assessment area;

A description of the method by which the amount of the proposed special assessment will be determined for each class of real property to which the special assessment is proposed to apply, in sufficient detail to enable the owner of the affected parcel to determine the amount of the special assessment;

A description of the community infrastructure to be financed with special assessment bonds or revenues; and

A statement that any person affected by the proposed special assessment may object in writing or in person at the hearing.

If, after the hearing, the district board finds that it will be for the best interest of the district and the real property within the assessment area that the aggregate fair market value of the real property within the assessment area, including the value of the community infrastructure to be financed or paid for with the special assessments, and the infrastructure for which performance bonds or other financial assurances have been received, is at least three (3) times the aggregate principal amount of the special assessment bonds as determined by an MAI appraisal in form and substance acceptable to the district board, the district board shall adopt a resolution approving the imposition of the special assessment and, also by resolution, shall prepare a form of assessment roll numbering each assessment, giving the name, if known, of the owner of each lot or parcel of real property assessed, showing the amount chargeable to each such lot or parcel, and finding that each such lot or parcel is benefited to the amount of assessment imposed thereon. Such resolution shall be the final determination of the regularity, validity and correctness of the assessment roll, of each assessment contained therein, and of the amount thereof imposed on each such lot or parcel. Special assessments may be prepaid and permanently satisfied in whole or in part at any point in time. Prepayment of special assessments shall be paid in cash to the district in the following manner: (i) the interest on such portion to the next date special assessment bonds may be redeemed, plus (ii) the unpaid principal amount of such portion rounded up to the next highest multiple of one thousand dollars ($1,000), plus (iii) any premium due on such redemption date with respect to such portion, plus (iv) any administrative or other fees charged by the district with respect thereto, less (v) the amount by which any reserve fund associated with the special assessment may be reduced on the redemption date as a result of such prepayment.
(4) Special assessment bonds approved at the hearing shall be issued in the manner provided by the laws of the state of Idaho, and the district board by further resolution shall be entitled to issue and sell the bonds in series or divisions up to the authorized amount without further hearing, and to issue and sell such bonds at such times and in such amounts as the district board deems appropriate to carry out a community infrastructure project or projects in phases. Bond proceeds shall be expended on the community infrastructure within three (3) years after issuance. Prior to issuance of the bonds, the district board shall determine that such bond proceeds can reasonably be expended within such time.

The maximum amount of any special assessment that may be imposed shall not be increased over time by any amount exceeding two percent (2%) per year, up to a maximum of ten percent (10%);

The special assessment shall be imposed for a specified time period, after which no further special assessment shall be imposed and collected; and

Subject to the applicable laws of this state, nothing in this subsection shall preclude the establishment of different categories of residential property or changing the amount of the special assessment imposed upon a parcel whose size or use is changed. A change in the amount of a special assessment imposed upon a parcel due to a change in its size or use shall not require notice and hearing, if the method for changing the amount of special assessment was approved at the hearing approving the special assessment and was described in sufficient detail to enable the owner of the affected parcel to determine how the change in size or use of the parcel would affect the amount of the special assessment.
(8) A district’s imposition of a special assessment shall constitute a lien on the real property within the assessment area subject to the special assessment, including real property acquired by the state or its political subdivisions after the imposition of the special assessment, which shall be effective during the period in which the special assessment is imposed and shall have a priority coequal to the lien of real property taxes. A special assessment shall be subject to foreclosure by the district in the same manner as real property tax liens under the laws of this state, provided that a special assessment shall be subject to foreclosure at any time after thirty (30) days following written notice of delinquency to the owner of the real property to which the delinquency applies. The portion of proceeds of any foreclosure sale necessary to discharge the lien for the special assessment shall be deposited in the special bond fund for payment of any obligations secured thereby.

(5) After the bonds are issued, the district board shall enter in its minutes a record of the bonds sold and their numbers and dates and shall periodically collect the pledged revenues to pay the debt service on the bonds when due.

(6) Each year, prior to the time for the certification required under section 50-3114, Idaho Code, the district board shall impose a special assessment upon the real property within the assessment area of the district that will be subject to the special assessment sufficient, together with any moneys from the sources described in section 50-3107(3), Idaho Code, to pay debt service on the bonds when due, in addition to reasonable costs associated with the collection of the special assessment payments. The special assessment shall be made by resolution entered upon the minutes of the district board, and it shall be the duty of the clerk of the district, immediately after entry of the resolution in the minutes, to transmit to the board of county commissioners in each county in which the district is located, the certification required under section 50-3114, Idaho Code. Such special assessment shall then be collected and accounted for at the time and in the form and manner as property taxes are collected and accounted for under the laws of this state. Moneys derived from the imposition of the special assessment to pay the debt service on the bonds shall be kept separately from other moneys of the district.

(7) Special assessments against privately owned residential property shall be subject to the following provisions:

(9) No holder of special assessment bonds issued pursuant to this chapter may compel any exercise of the taxing power of the district, county or city to pay the bonds or the interest on the bonds. Special assessment bonds issued pursuant to this chapter are not a debt of the state of Idaho or any political subdivision thereof including the district, county or city, nor is the payment of special assessment bonds enforceable out of any moneys other than the revenue pledged to the payment of the bonds.

(10) Subject to the provisions of this section, a district may issue special assessment bonds at such times and in such amounts as the district deems appropriate to carry out a project or projects in phases, and payment may be made pursuant to a draw schedule.

(11) The district may issue and sell refunding bonds to refund any special assessment bonds of the district authorized in this chapter. The principal amount of the refunding bonds may be more or less than the principal amount of the bonds being refunded, provided the proceeds of the refunding bonds are used only for refunding purposes and payment of the costs thereof, and the total obligation of the district is not increased, that is, if the amount of the refunding bonds is more than the principal amount of the bonds being refunded, issuance of the refunding bonds will result in a net present value savings to the district. No election shall be required in connection with the issuance and sale of such refunding bonds. Refunding bonds issued pursuant to this section shall have a final maturity date no later than the final maturity date of the bonds being refunded.

§ 50-3110. Revenue bonds — Election.

Subject to section 3, article VIII, of the constitution of the state of Idaho, after district formation, whenever the district board shall deem it advisable to issue revenue bonds of the district, the district board shall provide therefor by resolution, which resolution shall specify and set forth the community infrastructure consistent with the general plan to be financed with such bonds.

The resolution shall also provide for holding an election, held in compliance with section 50-3112, Idaho Code, to submit to the qualified electors of the district the question of authorizing the district to issue revenue bonds of the district to provide moneys for such community infrastructure consistent with the general plan.

Except as otherwise specifically set forth in this section, the provisions of the water and sewer district revenue bond act codified in chapter 41, title 42, Idaho Code, shall apply with respect to the issuance of revenue bonds and refunding bonds under this section in substantially the same manner as if the district were a water and/or sewer district issuing bonds pursuant to the water and sewer district revenue bond act, and the district board shall conduct itself in the issuance of revenue bonds in substantially the same manner as the commissioners of a district under the water and sewer district revenue bond act.

If the revenue bonds are approved at the election, the district board shall thereupon be authorized to issue and create such indebtedness in the manner and for the purposes specified in said resolution, and such bonds shall be issued and sold in the manner provided by the laws of the state of Idaho.

After the bonds are issued, the district board shall enter in its minutes a record of the bonds sold and their numbers and dates and shall periodically collect the pledged revenues to pay the debt service on the bonds when due.

Money derived from the collection of revenues pledged to pay the debt service on the bonds shall be kept separately from other moneys of the district.

No holder of revenue bonds issued pursuant to this chapter may compel any exercise of the taxing power of the district, county or city to pay the bonds or the interest on the bonds. Revenue bonds issued pursuant to this chapter are not a debt of the state or any political subdivision thereof, including any county or city in which the district is located, nor are they the debt of the district, other than with respect to the revenue pledged to the payment of the bonds. The payment of revenue bonds is not enforceable out of any money other than the revenue pledged to the payment of the bonds.

Subject to the provisions of this section, a district may issue revenue bonds at such times and in such amounts as the district deems appropriate to carry out a project in phases.

§ 50-3111. Terms of bonds.

For any bonds issued under this chapter, the district board shall prescribe the denominations of the bonds, the principal amount of each issue and the form of the bonds and shall establish the maturities, which shall not exceed thirty (30) years, interest payment dates and interest rates, whether fixed or variable, not exceeding the maximum rate stated in the notice of the election or the resolution of the district board. The bonds, up to the aggregate authorized principal amount thereof, may be issued in whole or divided into series, and by supplementary resolution adopted from time to time by the district board, the district may issue any remaining principal amount of the bonds in one (1) or more subsequent divisions. No election shall be required in connection with the issuance of any remaining principal amount of the bonds in a subsequent division. The bonds may be sold by competitive bid or negotiated sale for public or private offering at, below or above par. The proceeds of the bonds shall be deposited with the treasurer, or with a trustee or agent designated by the district board, to the credit of the district to be withdrawn for the purposes provided by this chapter. Pending that use, the proceeds may be invested as determined by the district board. The bonds shall be made payable as to both principal and interest solely from revenues of the district, and shall specify the revenues pledged for such purposes, and shall contain such other terms, conditions, covenants and agreements as the district board deems proper. The bonds may be payable from any combination of taxes or revenues of the types described in sections 50-3108, 50-3109 and 50-3110, Idaho Code.

§ 50-3112. Notice and conduct of election.

Any election pursuant to this chapter shall be a nonpartisan election, and in regard to election dates, shall be held in compliance with section 34-106, Idaho Code, or section 50-405, Idaho Code. Except as otherwise specifically set forth in this section, the district board shall cause the election to be held and conducted in the same manner prescribed by law for the holding of general elections in this state, including chapter 14, title 34, Idaho Code, and shall call the election by posting notices in three (3) public places within the boundaries of the district not less than thirty (30) days before the election. Notice shall also be published twice, the first time not less than twelve (12) days prior to the election and the second time not less than five (5) days prior to the election, in a newspaper of general circulation in each county or city in which the proposed district is located. A copy of such notice shall also be mailed to each district resident and each owner of real property in the district if known or such owner’s agent if known, addressed to such person at his or her post office address if known or, if unknown, to a post office in the county or city where the district is located. Ownership of real property shall be determined as of the date of the adoption of the resolution ordering the hearing. The notice shall state:

The place of holding the election;

Subject to section 34-1409, Idaho Code, the hours during the day in which the polls will be open;

If the election is a bond election, whether the bonds are general obligation bonds or revenue bonds, the total principal amount of bonds to be authorized, whether the bonds will be issued in series, the maximum rate of interest to be paid on the bonds and the maximum term of the bonds, not exceeding thirty (30) years;

If the election is an election to change or eliminate an existing tax, the maximum tax amount to be imposed as a result of the change or elimination;

The purposes for which property taxes levied and revenues raised will be used, including a description of the community infrastructure to be financed with tax revenues, district revenues or bond proceeds;

That the imposition of property taxes will result in a lien for the payment thereof on real property within the district; and

That a general plan is on file with the county clerk of each county in which the district is located.

The district board shall determine the date of the election and the polling place or places for the election. The district board may establish, change, and consolidate election precincts within the district, as it deems necessary and appropriate, and shall define precinct boundaries.

Subject to section 50-3102(10) and (13), Idaho Code, the current property rolls for the district and current voter lists in effect at the time that the election has begun shall be used to determine the qualified electors. If the district includes land lying partly in and partly out of any precinct, the voter lists may contain the names of all electors in the precinct, and the precinct boards at those precincts shall require that a prospective elector execute an affidavit stating that the elector is also a qualified elector.
(4) If the district is to be located within two (2) or more counties and/or cities, the election shall be held on the same day in each jurisdiction.

For an election concerning the issuance of bonds, an impartial description of the bonds to be issued and an impartial description of the property taxes to be imposed; the method of apportionment, collection and enforcement and other details sufficient to enable each qualified elector to reasonably estimate the amount of tax he or she will be obligated to pay; and a statement that the issuance of the bonds and the imposition of property taxes is for the provision of certain, but not necessarily all, community infrastructure that may be needed or desirable within the district, and that other taxes or assessments by other governmental entities may be presented for approval by qualified electors; and

For an election to change an existing maximum tax or eliminate an existing tax, an impartial description of the change or elimination.

(5) The ballot material provided to each voter shall include:

(6) Within ten (10) days after an election, the district board shall meet and canvass the returns, and declare the results thereof. At least a two-thirds (2/3) majority of the votes cast at the election shall be required for issuing bonds or changing an existing tax. The canvass may be continued for an additional period not to exceed thirty (30) days at the election of the district board for the purpose of completing the canvass. Failure of a required majority to vote in favor of the matter submitted shall not prejudice the submission of the same or similar matters at a later election. The canvass of any general obligation bond election shall be filed and recorded in each county in which the district is located.

(7) In any election held pursuant to this chapter, every voter may vote at any election held pursuant to this chapter, but shall be entitled to cast votes, as follows: (i) each resident qualified elector shall be entitled to one (1) vote; and (ii) each owner qualified elector shall be entitled to one (1) vote. An owner qualified elector shall not be entitled to an additional vote as a result of also being a resident of the district. When record title is held in more than one (1) name, the owners shall file with the clerk of the district at or prior to the election a designation in writing, of which one of the owners shall be deemed the owner for purposes of voting.

(8) In conducting an election, the polling official may require evidence of ownership of property and designation of the power to exercise the vote of any owner consistent with the provisions of this section and section 50-3102(10), Idaho Code.

§ 50-3113. Cost of administration.

Each year, prior to the time for the certification required under section 50-3114, Idaho Code, the district board may levy a tax upon all taxable real property within the district of up to one-hundredth of one percent (.01%) of the market value for assessment purposes on all taxable real property within the district, to be used only to reimburse or defray the administrative expenses of the district pursuant to a district development agreement. No election shall be required. The levy shall be made by resolution entered upon the minutes of the district board, and it shall be the duty of the clerk of the district, immediately after entry of the resolution in the minutes, to transmit to the board of county commissioners in each county in which the district is located, the certification required under section 50-3114, Idaho Code. Such tax shall then be collected and accounted for at the time and in the form and manner as other taxes are collected and accounted for under the laws of this state.

§ 50-3114. Annual financial statements and estimates — Annual budget — Certification.

When levying property taxes or imposing special assessments, and prior to certification of same to the county commissioners, the district board shall make annual statements and estimates of the administrative expenses of the district, the costs of community infrastructure to be financed by property taxes and special assessments and the amount of all other expenditures for community infrastructure proposed to be paid from property taxes and special assessments and of the amount to be raised to pay general obligation bonds and special assessment bonds of the district, all of which shall be provided for by the levy, imposition and collection of property taxes and special assessments. The annual estimates prepared by the district board shall include an amount determined by the district board, in consultation with the county tax collector, to defray the costs imposed upon the county tax collector’s office for any additional administrative services that will be required in the collection of and accounting for such district property taxes and special assessments. Such additional costs shall be for those services not otherwise included in the general tax collection and accounting services already provided by the county tax collector’s office and otherwise paid for by property tax revenues, and shall be reasonably related to, but shall not exceed, the actual cost of the additional administrative services provided. The district board shall file the annual statements and estimates with the district clerk and, not later than the time required by section 63-802A, Idaho Code, shall set and notify the county clerk of the date and location set for the annual budget hearing of the district. The district board shall publish a notice of the filing of the estimate, shall hold a public hearing on the portion of the estimate not relating to debt service on general obligation bonds and special assessment bonds and shall adopt a budget. Notice of the budget hearing shall be posted at least ten (10) days prior to the date of said meeting in at least one (1) conspicuous place within the district to be determined by the district board; a copy of the notice shall also be published in a newspaper of general circulation in the county or city in which the proposed district is located, in one (1) issue thereof, during such ten (10) day period. The place, hour and day of the hearing shall be specified in said notice, as well as the place where the budget may be examined prior to the hearing. A full and complete copy of the proposed budget shall be published with and as a part of the publication of the notice of hearing. The budget shall be available for public inspection from and after the date of the posting of notices of hearing as in this section provided, at such place and during such business hours as the district board may direct. A quorum of the district board shall attend the hearing and explain the proposed budget and hear any and all objections to the proposed budget. The district board at the time of the certification required under subsection (2) of this section shall file with the board of county commissioners in each county in which the district is located a certified copy of the annual budget as previously prepared, approved and adopted.

The district board, having determined the total amount required from property taxes and special assessments to raise the amount of money fixed by the annual budget, including the amount of money needed to satisfy annual bond payments, shall cause the amount of money so determined to be certified in dollars to the board of county commissioners in each county in which the district is located not later than the time required for certification under section 63-803, Idaho Code. Said certification shall list separately each tax levy and special assessment if more than one (1), and the purpose of each thereof, and shall otherwise comply with the requirements of section 63-803, Idaho Code.

Following such certification to the county commissioners, district property taxes and special assessments shall then be collected and accounted for at the time and in the form and manner as other taxes are collected and accounted for under the laws of this state. Except as specifically provided otherwise in this chapter, all statutes of this state relating to the levy, imposition, collection, settlement and payment of property taxes, including the collection of delinquent taxes and sale of property for nonpayment of taxes and special assessments, apply to district property taxes and special assessments.

§ 50-3115. Disclosure.

The district board shall record with the county clerk in each county in which the district is located, upon the records of each parcel of real property within the district that will be encumbered with any future general obligation bond or special assessment bond repayment liability, a notice setting forth:

The current obligation of a property owner within the district with respect to any bond repayment liability;

That the obligation to retire the bonds will be the responsibility of any property owner in the district through the payment of real property taxes and special assessments collected by the county treasurer in addition to all other property tax payments;

The estimated maximum tax or special assessment rate upon the parcel for bond repayment;

Whether the tax or special assessment rate is to be maintained at any level by means of any developer agreement with the district; and

That in the event of the failure to maintain the tax rate, the tax rate on a parcel will increase, as needed, to provide for bond repayment.

Such notice may be separately recorded or included in a recorded district development agreement. The governing body, in its resolution approving formation of the district, shall require that a form disclosure, consistent with the foregoing, be signed and acknowledged by any purchaser of land within the district prior to purchase. The form disclosure shall be entitled “CID TAX AND SPECIAL ASSESSMENT DISCLOSURE NOTICE” and shall specifically and conspicuously set forth “YOU ARE PURCHASING REAL PROPERTY THAT IS INCLUDED WITHIN THE BOUNDARIES OF A COMMUNITY INFRASTRUCTURE DISTRICT.” Further, the notice shall set forth such other notifications as determined appropriate by the district board that shall fully and fairly disclose the property owner’s general obligation bond and special assessment repayment liability with examples provided.

§ 50-3116. Dissolution of district.

The district shall be dissolved by the district board by a resolution of the district board upon a determination that each of the following conditions exist:

All community infrastructure owned by the district has been, or provision has been made for all community infrastructure to be conveyed, either to the state of Idaho or to a political subdivision thereof, which shall include a county or city in which the district is located, or to a public district or other authority authorized by the laws of this state to own such community infrastructure;

The district has no outstanding bond obligations; and

All obligations of the district pursuant to any contracts or agreements entered into by the district have been satisfied.

All property within the district that is subject to the lien of district taxes or special assessments shall remain subject to the lien for the payment of general obligation bonds or special assessment bonds, as the case may be, notwithstanding dissolution of the district. The district shall not be dissolved if any revenue bonds of the district remain outstanding unless an amount of money sufficient, together with investment income thereon, to make all payments due on the revenue bonds, either at maturity or prior redemption, has been deposited with a trustee or escrow agent and pledged to the payment and redemption of the bonds. The district may continue to operate after dissolution only as needed to collect money and make payments on any outstanding bonds.

The district shall send a notice of dissolution to the governing body or bodies, the county assessor of each county in which the district is located, and the state tax commission. The district shall also record a notice of dissolution with the county clerk in each county in which the district is located.

Subject to the foregoing provisions of this section, if upon dissolution of the district there remain any excess moneys of the district, the district board shall, by resolution, cause the same to be fairly distributed among the current taxpayers of the district. If, as determined in the sole discretion of the district board, the amount to be distributed is de minimis, or the administrative cost of distribution is prohibitive, such remaining moneys shall be paid to the county treasurer of each county in which the district is located to be distributed among the cities and counties in which the district is located in proportion to which said cities and counties receive property tax revenues generally.

§ 50-3117. Exemptions and exclusions.

All public utilities, as defined in section 61-129, Idaho Code, shall be exempt from taxation under this chapter.

No railroad right-of-way may be included within a community infrastructure district without the consent of the railroad.

No personal property within a community infrastructure district shall be subject to taxation under this chapter.

§ 50-3118. Limitation of liability.

Neither any member of the district board nor any person acting on behalf of the district, while acting within the scope of his or her authority, shall be subject to any personal liability for any action taken or omitted within that scope of authority.

§ 50-3119. Appeal — Exclusive remedy — Conclusiveness.

Any person in interest who feels aggrieved by the final decision of a governing body or a district board in the formation or governing of a district, including, with respect to any tax levy, special assessment or bond, may, within sixty (60) days after such final decision, seek judicial review by filing a written notice of appeal with the clerk of the district and with the clerk of the district court for the judicial district in which a majority of the land area of the district is located. After said sixty (60) day period has run, no one shall have any cause or right of action to contest the legality, formality or regularity of said decision for any reason whatsoever and, thereafter, said decision shall be considered valid and uncontestable and the validity, legality and regularity of any such decision shall be conclusively presumed. With regard to the foregoing, if the question of validity of any bonds issued pursuant to this chapter is not raised on appeal as aforesaid, the authority to issue the bonds, the legality thereof and of the levies or assessments necessary to pay the same shall be conclusively presumed and no court shall thereafter have authority to inquire into such matters.

§ 50-3120. Consistency with state law.

A community infrastructure district shall develop community infrastructure consistent with the general plan and in compliance with the requirements of chapter 13, title 50, Idaho Code, and chapter 65, title 67, Idaho Code.

A community infrastructure district shall be deemed to be of the same nature and afforded the same treatment as a local improvement district for purposes of application of section 58-336, Idaho Code, relating to lands benefitting by such district; section 67-8209, Idaho Code, authorizing development impact fee credits; and section 67-8214, Idaho Code, providing that other powers and rights of governmental entities are not affected.

§ 50-3121. Severability.

The provisions of this chapter are hereby declared to be severable and if any provision or the application of the provision to any person or circumstance is declared invalid for any reason, such declaration shall not affect the validity of remaining portions of this chapter.